GRAMMARS/ENGLISH.old/FST/GM/src/rules-new.xfst
# ============================================================================
# CONTENT:      rules for plural and genitive
# 
# LANGUAGE:     ENGLISH
#
# AUTHOR:       A. Schiller
#
# CREATED:      30-Mar-2006
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:        xfst -utf8 -s LEX.fst -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================

define LEX


# identify tags
read regex LEX;
single char sigma net
define SIG
read regex [ %+ ?+ ] .o. SIG ;
multi char sigma net
define TAG

read regex [ %^ ?+ ] .o. SIG ;
multi char sigma net
define DIAC

define CHAR	\[TAG|DIAC] ;

# remove tags from surface side and diacritics form lexical side
read regex [ 
	0 <- DIAC 
.o.	%+Gen <- [ %^GenSg | %^GenPl ] 
.o.	%. <- %^DOT	
.o.	{ and } <- %^AND 
.o.	{and } <- %^AND 	|| .#. _
.o. 	LEX 
.o. 	TAG -> 0 
.o.	%^AND	->  [ {and } | {&} | {& } ]  || .#. _
.o.	%^AND	->  [ { and } | {&} | { & } ] 
.o.	%^DOT	->  [ %. | 0 ]
];
define LEX

# move major tags
define CAT  	[ %+Noun | %+Adj | %+NAdj | %+Prop ];	

read regex [
	0 <- CAT || $[CAT] _
.o.	%+Noun <- [..] || CHAR _ TAG+ %+Noun
.o.	%+Adj  <- [..] || CHAR _ TAG+ %+Adj
.o.	%+NAdj <- [..] || CHAR _ TAG+ %+NAdj
.o.	%+Prop <- [..] || CHAR _ TAG+ %+Prop
.o. LEX ];
define LEX

# move abbrviation tags
define FIN  	[ %+Abbr | %+Acron ];	

read regex [
	0 <- FIN || _ $[FIN] 
.o.	%+Abbr  <- [..] || $[%+Abbr] _ .#.
.o.	%+Acron <- [..] || $[%+Acron] _ .#.
.o. LEX ];
define LEX

# -------------------------------------------------------------------
# apply some rules

define CONS	[b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q (u)|r|s|t|v|w|x|z];
define APOS	%';
define SEP	%- | %  ;


read regex	[
	LEX
# move plural ending (e.g. attorney^PLX_of_law+s -> attorney+s_of_law)
.o.	[..] -> {+s}	|| _ %^PLX ${+s}	# move plural ending
.o.	{+s} ->	0	|| $%^PLX _
.o.	%^PLX -> 0

# plural forms
.o.	{man} %^MAN {+s} -> {men} 		# Scotchman+s -> Scotchmen
.o.	%^PlE -> e	|| _ {+s} 		# archipelago^E+s  -> archipelagoes
.o.	{y+s} -> {ies}  || CONS _		# territory+s -> territories
.o.	{+s} -> {es}	|| [ s | x | z ] _	
.o.	{+s} (->) {es}	|| [ c h ] _
.o.	[ %^MAN | %^PlE | %+ ] -> 0

# genitive 's 
.o.	%^GenSg (->) APOS  || [ s | x | z ]	_ 
.o.	%^GenPl -> APOS  || [ s | x | z ]	_ 
.o.	[ %^GenSg | %^GenPl ] -> {'s}


# some short forms (in proper names):
.o.	{Fort} 		(->) {Ft} (%.)  || _ SEP
.o.	{Mountain} 	(->) {Mtn} (%.)	|| _ SEP
.o.	{Mount} 	(->) {Mt} (%.)	|| _ SEP
.o.	{Saint} 	(->) {St} (%.)	|| _ SEP 
.o.	{Sankt} 	(->) {St} (%.)	|| _ SEP 

# clean up any remaining diacritics
.o.	DIAC -> 0

];
